Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
CHAPTER 5 Art in State Buildings

8-5-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Art in State Buildings Program.”

History.

Code 1981, §

8-5-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 891, § 1.

8-5-2.
Legislative purpose.

The General Assembly finds and declares that the State of Georgia has a responsibility for expanding public experience with art. The General Assembly recognizes that other states have enacted legislation requiring the expenditure of 1 percent of funds allocated for the construction of state buildings for works of art for such buildings.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-5-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 891, § 1.

8-5-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Acquisition” means acquisition by purchase, lease, or commission.

“Council” means the Georgia Council for the Arts.

“State buildings” means state office buildings, hospitals, prisons, buildings of state authorities, and such other state buildings which the Georgia Council for the Arts deems appropriate for the inclusion of art as provided in this chapter but shall not mean either the state capitol or the capitol education center.

“Work of art” means any work of visual art, including, but not limited to, a drawing, painting, mural, fresco, sculpture, mosaic, or photograph; a work of calligraphy; a work of graphic art, including an etching, lithograph, offset print, silk screen, or a work of graphic art of like nature; crafts, including crafts in clay, textile, fiber, wood, metal, plastic, glass, or like materials; or mixed media, including a collage, assemblage, or any combination of the foregoing art media. The term “work of art” does not include environmental landscaping placed about a state building.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-5-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 891, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1332, § 1.

Cross references.

Georgia Council for the Arts, §

50-12-20

et seq.

8-5-4.
Gifts and appropriations.

Financing of works of art in state buildings shall be subject to appropriations by the General Assembly. The Governor shall include a budget item for art in state buildings in the budget of the Office of Planning and Budget in the annual budget submitted to the General Assembly.

The council may accept grants, gifts, donations, bequests, or federal money made in connection with the art in state buildings program and expend such funds for the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-5-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 891, § 1.

8-5-5.
Duties of the art council.

In order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the council shall do all of the following:

Determine and implement procedures for the purchase or lease by written contract of existing works of art from an artist or the artist’s authorized agent. Works of art to be purchased or leased shall be selected by the council from lists of works prepared and submitted by advisory committees empowered by the council. In making such purchases or in executing such leases, preference may be given to artists who are Georgia residents. No lease obligation shall be incurred under the provisions of this chapter without the prior approval of the Office of Planning and Budget.

Determine and implement procedures, one of which shall provide for competition among artists, for the selection and commissioning of artists by written contract to create works of art. Commissioned artists shall be selected by the council from lists of qualified and available artists prepared and submitted by advisory committees empowered by the council. In making such contracts, preference may be given to artists who are Georgia residents.

If competition among artists is the procedure for selection of an artist pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a panel of three judges shall be appointed to make such selection. The panel shall consist of the director of the Office of Planning and Budget or a person designated by such director, a member of the council or a person designated by the council, and one person selected by the other two who shall be a visual artist, an architect or designer, a person employed by an art museum, or a collector of visual art. At least one judge on each panel shall be a working visual artist;

Consult with each artist commissioned regarding the design and placement of a work of art;

Ensure that works of art acquired pursuant to this chapter are placed in a manner so that they are within public view;

Ensure that the program for acquisition of works of art pursuant to this chapter results in participation by many different artists and in acquisitions from among many of the different art forms referred to in paragraph (4) of Code Section 8-5-3. A person who is, or is related to, a member of the council or is employed by the council or a person related to or employed in the office of the director of the Office of Planning and Budget may not be selected or commissioned pursuant to this chapter;

Cooperate with other affected state agencies and consult with the artist to ensure that each work of art acquired pursuant to this chapter is properly maintained and is not artistically altered in any manner without the consent of the artist;

Promulgate rules and regulations, as necessary, in consultation with the council and any other person, group, or association in the State of Georgia related to architecture, design, or the arts so as to facilitate the implementation of the council’s responsibilities under this chapter; and

Authorize payments to artists for works of art acquired pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-5-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 891, § 1.

Cross references.

Powers and duties generally of Georgia Council for the Arts, §

50-12-23

.

8-5-6.
Purchases and commissions exempt from bidding requirements.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the selection and commissioning of artists and the purchase and execution of works of art for state buildings shall be exempt from the provisions of law relating to bidding requirements in connection with state buildings.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-5-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 891, § 1.

8-5-7.
Ownership rights; rights of artists.

The state shall receive sole ownership of each work of art acquired pursuant to this chapter, including all tangible rights and privileges thereof, subject to the following intangible rights retained by the artist:

The right to claim authorship of the work of art;

The right to reproduce such work of art, including all rights to which the work of art may be subject under copyright laws. Such rights may be limited by written contract; and

If provided by written contract, the right to receive a specified percentage of the proceeds if the work of art is subsequently sold by the state to a third party other than as part of the sale of the building in which the work of art is located.

The rights granted to the artist by subsection (a) of this Code section may by written contract be extended to such artist’s heirs, assigns, or personal representatives until after the end of the twentieth year following the death of such artist.

Prior to execution of a written contract, the artist shall be informed in writing of the rights specified in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section which may be granted by contract to the artist or to the artist’s heirs, assigns, or personal representatives.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-5-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 891, § 1.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Pay What You Like — No, Really:
Why Copyright Law Should Make Digital Music Free for Noncommercial Uses,” see 58 Emory L.J. 1495 (2009).

For note, “How to Get the Mona Lisa in your Home Without Breaking the Law:
Painting a Picture of Copyright Issues with Digitally Accessible Museum Collections,” see 18 J. Intell. Prop. L. 567 (2011).

8-5-8.
Annual report.

In consultation with the director of the Office of Planning and Budget, the council shall prepare an annual report relative to the art in state buildings program pursuant to this chapter. The council shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the annual report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient.
Such report may be submitted as part of a report on the activities and programs of the council.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-5-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 891, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 1/SB 49.

Cross references.

Annual report of Georgia Council for the Arts, §

50-12-24

.

8-5-9.
Sale of works of art by state.

If a work of art acquired pursuant to this chapter is to be sold by the state, such sale shall be made to the highest bidder, conditioned on the work of art first being offered to the artist at the bid price.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-5-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 891, § 1.